test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adj-odd_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable adjectives belonging to VIELG, MEAHTTUS, JOHTIL, GARAS, BOAKKAS, GAPPUS, LAGAN 

Tests:
  Adj - šealgat: # VIELG
    šealgat+A+Attr: šelges
    šealgat+A+Sg+Nom: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen: šealgada
    šealgat+A+Sg+Acc: šealgada
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Ill: šealgadii
    šealgat+A+Sg+Loc: šealgadis
    šealgat+A+Pl+Acc: šealgadiid
    šealgat+A+Pl+Com: šealgadiiguin
    šealgat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeabbo, šealgadabbo, šealgadut, šealgadit, šealgadet, šealgadat]
    šealgat+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeabbu, šealgadabbu]
    šealgat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid]
    šealgat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeamos, šealgadamos]
    šealgat+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: šealgadeamus
    šealgat+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [šealgadepmosiin, šealgadamosiin]
    šealgat+A+Der/at+Adv: šealgadit


  Adj - guoskkatmeahttun: # MEAHTTUS
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Attr: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Nom: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Gen: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Ill: guoskkatmeahttumii
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Loc: guoskkatmeahttumis
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Acc: guoskkatmeahttumiid
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiiguin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseabbo, guoskkatmeahttusabbo, guoskkatmeahttusut, guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttuset, guoskkatmeahttusat]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttusabbu, guoskkatmeahttuseabbu]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseamos, guoskkatmeahttusamos]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: guoskkatmeahttuseamus
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [guoskkatmeahttusepmosiin, guoskkatmeahttusamosiin]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/at+Adv: [guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttumit]

  Adj - doaibmil: # JOHTIL
    doaibmil+A+Attr: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Nom: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen: doaibmila
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Acc: doaibmila
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Ill: doaibmilii
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Loc: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Acc: doaibmiliid
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Com: doaibmiliiguin
    doaibmil+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileabbo, doaibmilabbo, doaibmilut, doaibmilit, doaibmilet, doaibmilat]
    doaibmil+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileabbu, doaibmilabbu]
    doaibmil+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileamos, doaibmilamos]
    doaibmil+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: doaibmileamus
    doaibmil+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [doaibmilepmosiin, doaibmilamosiin]
    doaibmil+A+Der/at+Adv: doaibmilit

  Adj - ceaikkas: # GARAS
    ceaikkas+A+Attr: ceaika
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Nom: ceaikkas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen: ceaikasa
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Acc: ceaikasa
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: ceaikas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: ceaikas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Ill: ceaikasii
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Loc: ceaikasis
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Acc: ceaikasiid
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Com: ceaikasiiguin
    ceaikkas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseabbo, ceaikasabbo, ceaikasut, ceaikasit, ceaikaset, ceaikasat]
    ceaikkas+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseabbu, ceaikasabbu]
    ceaikkas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseamos, ceaikasamos]
    ceaikkas+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: ceaikaseamus
    ceaikkas+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [ceaikasepmosiin, ceaikasamosiin]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/at+Adv: ceaikasit

  Adj - boahkis: # BOAKKAS
    boahkis+A+Sg+Nom: boahkis
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen: boahkkása
    boahkis+A+Sg+Acc: boahkkása
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: boahkkás
    boahkis+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: boahkkás
    boahkis+A+Sg+Ill: boahkkásii
    boahkis+A+Sg+Loc: boahkkásis
    boahkis+A+Pl+Acc: boahkkásiid
    boahkis+A+Pl+Com: boahkkásiiguin
    boahkis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseabbo, boahkkásabbo, boahkkásut, boahkkásit, boahkkáset, boahkkásat]
    boahkis+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [boahkkásabbu, boahkkáseabbu]
    boahkis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: boahkkásebbuid
    boahkis+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: boahkkásebbuid
    boahkis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseamos, boahkkásamos]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseamus, boahkkásemos]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [boahkkásepmosiin, boahkkásamosiin]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [boahkkásamosiinna, boahkkásepmosiinna]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [boahkkásepmosiinna, boahkkásemosiinna]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: boahkkásemosiin
    boahkis+A+Der/at+Adv: boahkkásit

  Adj - gearpmus: # GAPPUS
    gearpmus+A+Attr: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Nom: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen: gerbmosa
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Acc: gerbmosa
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: gerbmos
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: gerbmos
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Ill: gerbmosii
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Loc: gerbmosis
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Acc: gerbmosiid
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Com: gerbmosiiguin
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseabbo, gerbmosabbo, gerbmosut, gerbmosit, gerbmoset, gerbmosat]
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [gerbmosabbu, gerbmoseabbu, gerbmosabbo, gerbmoseabbo, gerbmosebbo]
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: gerbmosebbuid
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseamos, gerbmosamos]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [gerbmosemos, gerbmoseamus]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [gerbmosepmosiin, gerbmosamosiin]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [gerbmosepmosiin, gerbmosemosiinna, gerbmosemosiin, gerbmosepmosiinna]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [gerbmosamosiinna, gerbmosepmosiinna, gerbmosemosiinna]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [gerbmosepmosiinna, gerbmosemosiinna]
    gearpmus+A+Der/at+Adv: gerbmosit


  Adj - guvrelágan: # LAGAN
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Attr:   guvrelágan
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Attr:   guvrelágán
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Attr:   guvrelagan
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Nom: guvrelágan
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Nom: guvrelágán
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Nom: guvrelagan
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelágana
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: guvrelágan
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelágána
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: guvrelágán
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelagana
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: guvrelagan
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Acc: [guvrelágana, guvrelágan]
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Acc: [guvrelágána, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Acc: [guvrelagana, guvrelagan]
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Ill: guvreláganii
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Ill: guvrelágánii
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: guvrelaganii
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Loc: guvreláganis
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Loc: guvrelágánis
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Loc: guvrelaganis
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Pl+Acc: guvreláganiid
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Pl+Acc: guvrelágániid
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: guvrelaganiid
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Pl+Com: guvreláganiiguin
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Pl+Com: guvrelágániiguin
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: guvrelaganiiguin
